California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(5) The public process and oversight governing the entity or program’s activities.

(b) Entities or programs established by the commission, other
 than those expressly authorized by statute, under the following sections:

(1) Section 379.6.

(2) Section 399.8.

(3) Section 739.1.

(4) Section 2790.

(5) Section 2851.

(6) Section 921.1.

(7) Section 922.

(c) Upon an entity ceasing operations, or a program ending, because its activities, including receiving revenue or making expenditures, have concluded, commission reporting on the entity or program pursuant to this section shall continue for the subsequent two fiscal years following the entity
 ceasing operations or the program ending. Following those subsequent two fiscal years, the commission shall note in the report submitted pursuant to this section which entity ceased operations or program ended, and the commission shall not be subject to any other reporting obligations related to the entity or program pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 37.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

910.5.

(a) The commission shall submit a report by April 1 of each year to the Legislature on residential and household gas and electric service disconnections that includes the following information for each community choice aggregator and each of the four electrical and gas corporations that have the greatest number of customers:

(1) For the most recent five years, the total annual number of residential disconnections for nonpayment, reconnections following disconnection for nonpayment, and disconnections for nonpayment that did not result in a reconnection within 30 days.

(2) For the most recent five years,
 the total annual number of
 households disconnected for nonpayment, households reconnected following disconnection for nonpayment, and households not reconnected within 30 days of being disconnected for nonpayment. A household disconnected more than once in a calendar year shall be counted only once for purposes of this reporting requirement.

(b) The commission shall disaggregate the information specified in subdivision (a) to provide that information for each of the following populations:

(1) Customers enrolled in the California Alternate Rates for Energy or CARE program.

(2) Customers enrolled in a Family Electric Rate Assistance program.

(3) Customers receiving a
 medical baseline allowance.

(4) Customers both enrolled in the CARE program and receiving a medical baseline allowance.

(5) Customers receiving assistance or a benefit under the federal Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8621 et seq.).

(6) Customers of a community choice aggregator who, after disconnection, are reconnected to service provided by an electrical corporation.

(c) For each of the customer categories listed in subdivision (b), the commission shall further disaggregate the information for individual customers as follows:

(1) Disconnected one time.

(2) Disconnected two times.

(3) Disconnected three or more times.

(4) Reconnected one time.

(5) Reconnected two times.

(6) Reconnected three or more times.

(d) For a corporation included in the report pursuant to subdivision (a) that provides both gas and electric service to customers, the commission shall provide the information separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 362, Sec. 4.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

910.6.

The commission shall annually submit a report to the Legislature on the commission’s advocacy efforts to keep transmission rates low for ratepayers through its participation in Federal Energy Regulatory Commission rate cases and the Independent System Operator’s transmission planning processes. The report shall include all of the following:

(a) The number of Federal Energy Regulatory Commission rate cases in which the commission participated.

(b) The amount of ratepayer moneys saved through the commission’s participation in Federal Energy Regulatory Commission rate cases.

(c) The nature of the commission’s participation in each rate case,
 including a description of each issue analyzed in the rate case, such as return on equity, taxes, depreciation, cost-of-service ratemaking, and assumptions for justifying project needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 44.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

910.7.

The commission shall annually provide the Legislature with an update on the status of its review of public utilities’ balancing accounts pursuant to Section 792.5. The commission shall provide this update as part of its annual report published pursuant to Section 910 or by posting it in a conspicuous area of its Internet Web site, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 805, Sec. 5.   (AB 2168)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

910.8.

(a) On or before June 30, 2023, the Low-Income Oversight Board established pursuant to Section 382.1 shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding the opportunity and process for expanding the third-party administrator contract used for the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service (ULTS) program, or establishing a similar new contract, to include water, gas, and electric utility service for purposes of facilitating enrollment between low-income assistance programs, minimizing privacy and data sharing concerns, and expediting eligibility verification processes. The report shall include a recommendation for funding the expansion of the contract or establishment of a new contract.

(b) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this
 section is repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 840, Sec. 3.   (SB 1208)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

911.

(a) Beginning February 1, 2016, the commission shall annually publish a report that includes all investigations into gas or electric service safety incidents reported, pursuant to commission requirements, by any gas corporation or electrical corporation. The report shall succinctly describe each safety investigation concluded during the prior calendar year and each investigation that remains open. The categories within the description shall include the month of the safety incident, the reason for the investigation, the facility type involved, and the owner of the facility.

(b) The commission shall include in its report required pursuant to Section 910, a summary of the staff safety investigations concluded during the prior
 calendar year and the staff safety investigations that remain open for any gas corporation or electrical corporation, with a link to the Internet Web site with the report that contains the information required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 915 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 49.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

911.1.

An action taken by the commission on a safety recommendation letter or advisory bulletin concerning gas pipeline safety issued by the federal National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) shall be reported annually, in detail, to the Legislature with the report required by Section 910. Correspondence from the NTSB that indicates that a recommendation of the NTSB has been closed following an action that the NTSB finds unacceptable shall be noted in the report required by Section 910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 33.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

911.2.

The commission shall report the findings of any risk assessment required by Section 1103 to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 6.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

912.

A summary of the audits conducted by the commission pursuant to Section 314.5 shall be provided annually to the Legislature. The commission may provide this information as part of its annual report delivered pursuant to Section 910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 34.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

912.1.

The Public Utilities Commission shall conduct an audit of the expenditures of the funds received pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5001) of Division 2 each fiscal year. The results of this audit shall be reported in writing, on or before February 15th of each year thereafter, with respect to the audit for the fiscal year ending on the previous June 30th, to the appropriate policy and budget committees of the respective houses of the Legislature.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5012 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 61.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

912.2.

On or before April 1, 2023, and biennially thereafter, the commission shall conduct a fiscal and performance audit of the implementation and effectiveness of the California Advanced Services Fund to ensure that funds have been expended in accordance with the approved terms of the grant awards and loan agreements pursuant to Section 281 or 281.2 and shall report its findings to the Legislature. The reports shall include an update to the maps in the final report of the California Broadband Task Force and data on the types and numbers of jobs created as a result of the program administered by the commission pursuant to Section 281 or 281.2 and shall include information specified in Section 914.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 112, Sec. 9.   (SB 156)   Effective July 20, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

912.3.

Immediately upon completion of an audit of any entity or program created by any order, decision, motion, settlement, or other action by the commission conducted pursuant to Section 314.6, the commission shall transmit a copy of the audit report to the Legislature, including to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees or subcommittees of the Legislature, and to the Governor. The audit report shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 20.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

913.

(a) The reporting requirements of this section apply to electrical corporations with at least 1,000,000 retail customers in California and gas corporations with at least 500,000 retail customers in California.

(b) The commission shall prepare a written report on the costs of programs and activities conducted by each electrical corporation and gas corporation that is subject to this section, including activities conducted to comply with their duty to serve. The report shall be completed on an annual basis before April 1 of each year, and shall identify, clearly and concisely, all of the following:

(1) Each program mandated by statute and its
 annual cost to ratepayers.

(2) Each program mandated by the commission and its annual cost to ratepayers.

(3) Energy purchase contract costs and bond-related costs incurred pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(4) All other aggregated categories of costs currently recovered in retail rates as determined by the commission.

(c) The report required by subdivision (b) shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature no later than April 1 of each year.

(d) The commission shall post the report required by subdivision (b) in a conspicuous area of its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 36.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

913.1.

(a) The commission, by May 1, 2010, and by each May 1 thereafter, shall prepare and submit a written report, separate from and in addition to the report required by Section 913, to the Governor and Legislature that contains all of the following:

(1) The commission’s recommendations for actions that can be undertaken during the succeeding 12 months to limit electrical corporations’ and gas corporations’ utility costs and rate increases.

(2) The commission’s recommendations that may take longer than 12 months to implement, but could lead to substantial reductions in monthly electricity and natural gas utility bills.

(3) Considerations of how the adoption of decarbonization policies, including electrification, may impact the total energy costs borne by consumers, including electricity, natural gas, and fuel for transportation, consistent with the state’s energy and environmental goals, including goals for reducing emissions of greenhouse gases.

(b) In preparing the report required by subdivision (a), the commission shall require electrical corporations with 1,000,000 or more retail customers in California, and gas corporations with 500,000 or more retail customers in California, to study and report on measures the corporation recommends be undertaken to limit costs and rate increases.

(c) The commission shall post the report required by subdivision (a) in a conspicuous area of its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   (AB 2462)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

913.2.

In addition to the information required to be submitted pursuant to Section 913, for each large electrical corporation, as defined in Section 3280, the report required by Section 913 shall also include all of the following information:

(a) The amount of ratebase for the transmission assets, distribution assets, and generation assets for the large electrical corporation with 10 years of historical values.

(b) The total amount for return on equity and return on debt, reported separately, collected in the revenue requirement for the transmission assets, distribution assets, and generation assets for the large electrical corporation.

(c) The
 total amount of federal, state, and local taxes associated with the return on equity collected in the revenue requirements for the transmission, distribution, and generation assets for the large electrical corporation.

(d) The portion of the annual revenue requirement associated with the return on equity, total return on ratebase, and the associated federal, state, and local taxes associated with the return on equity of the large electrical corporation.

(e) The actual mix of equity and debt capital in the large electrical corporation’s capital structure compared to the mix of equity and debt capital authorized by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 35.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

913.3.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 454.5 and Section 583, no later than May 1 of each year, the commission shall release to the Legislature for the preceding calendar year the costs of all electricity procurement contracts for eligible renewable energy resources, including unbundled renewable energy credits, and all costs for utility-owned generation approved by the commission.

(1) For power purchase contracts, the commission shall release costs in an aggregated form categorized according to the year the procurement transaction was approved by the commission, the eligible renewable energy resource type, including bundled renewable energy credits, the average executed contract price, and average actual recorded
 costs for each kilowatthour of production. Within each renewable energy resource type, the commission shall provide aggregated costs for different project size thresholds.

(2) For each utility-owned renewable generation project, the commission shall release the costs forecast by the electrical corporation at the time of initial approval and the actual recorded costs for each kilowatthour of production during the preceding calendar year.

(b) The commission shall report all electrical corporation revenue requirement increases associated with meeting the renewables portfolio standard, as defined in Section 399.12, including direct procurement costs for eligible renewable energy resources and renewable energy credits.

(c) The commission shall report all cost savings experienced, or costs avoided, by electrical
 corporations as a result of meeting the renewables portfolio standard.

(d) This section does not require the release of the terms of any individual electricity procurement contracts for eligible renewable energy resources, including unbundled renewable energy credits, approved by the commission. The commission shall aggregate data to the extent required to ensure protection of the confidentiality of individual contract costs even if this aggregation requires grouping contracts of different energy resource type. The commission shall not be required to release the data in any year when there are fewer than three contracts approved.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 913.4 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 23.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

913.4.

In order to evaluate the progress of the state’s electrical corporations in complying with the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3), the commission shall report to the Legislature no later than November 1 of each year on all of the following:

(a) The progress and status of procurement activities by each retail seller pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program.

(b) For each electrical corporation, an implementation schedule to achieve the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements, including all substantive actions that have been taken or
 will be taken to achieve the program procurement requirements.

(c) The projected ability of each electrical corporation to meet the renewables portfolio standard procurement requirements under the cost limitations in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 399.15 and any recommendations for revisions of those cost limitations.

(d) Any renewable energy procurement plan approved by the commission pursuant to Section 399.13, and a schedule and status report for all substantive procurement, transmission development, and other activities that the commission has approved to be undertaken by an electrical corporation to achieve the procurement requirements of the renewables portfolio standard.

(e) Any barriers to, and policy recommendations
 for, achieving the renewables portfolio standard pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program.

(f) The efforts each electrical corporation is taking to recruit and train employees to ensure an adequately trained and available workforce, including the number of new employees hired by the electrical corporation for purposes of implementing the requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program, the goals adopted by the electrical corporation for increasing women, minority, and disabled veterans trained or hired for purposes of implementing the requirements of that program, and, to the extent information is available, the number of new employees hired and the number of women, minority, and disabled veterans trained or hired by persons or corporations owning or operating eligible renewable energy
 resources under contract with an electrical corporation. This subdivision does not provide the commission with authority to engage in or regulate, or expand its authority to include, workforce recruitment or training.

(g) A systemwide assessment of delays to interconnection or transmission approvals for eligible renewable energy resources or energy storage resources, based on the annual reports submitted to the commission by electrical corporations pursuant to Section 399.13.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 229, Sec. 3.   (SB 1174)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

913.5.

(a) (1) Before July 1, 2022, and every three years thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature on the demand-side management programs it oversees or that are paid for by ratepayers of community choice aggregators, electrical corporations, or gas corporations, including, but not
 limited to, energy efficiency and demand response programs.

(2) The report shall include a list of all demand-side management programs, inclusive of codes and standards programs, with evaluations for each program that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Program description and target population.

(B) Authorized budgets and actual expenditures.

(C) Projected and actual energy savings over the program cycle.

(D) Projected and actual bill savings to the average participating and the average nonparticipating ratepayer.

(E) Cost-effectiveness analysis, including a total resource cost test and a program administrator cost test.

(F) Public interest impacts, as applicable.

(G) Actual customers served, aggregated by customer class, geographic distribution, and income level.

(H) Peak demand reduction, as applicable.

(I) Total system benefits, as adopted in the commission’s Decision 21-09-037 (September 23, 2021) Decision Adopting Energy Efficiency Goals for 2022-2032.

(3) The commission may provide evaluations at a portfolio level in addition
 to the individual program evaluation required pursuant to paragraph (2).

(b) In the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall also report to the Legislature on the progress toward achieving the targets established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 454.55 and subdivision (a) of Section 454.56. The commission shall include specific strategies for, and an update on, progress toward maximizing the contribution of energy and electricity efficiency
 bill savings in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 762, Sec. 4.   (AB 3264)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

913.6.

(a) On or before February 1, 2023, and biennially thereafter, the commission, in consultation with the Independent System Operator and the Energy Commission, shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the progress made toward modernizing the state’s distribution and transmission grid and the impacts of distributed energy resources on the state’s distribution and transmission grid and ratepayers. The report shall evaluate all of the following:

(1) Reliability and transmission issues related to connecting distributed energy resources to the local distribution networks and regional grid.

(2) Issues related to grid reliability and operation, including interconnection, and the position of federal
 and state regulators toward distributed energy resource accessibility.

(3) The effect on overall grid operation of various distributed energy resources.

(4) Barriers affecting the connection of distributed energy resources to the state’s grid.

(5) Emerging technologies related to distributed energy resource interconnection and operation.

(6) Interconnection issues that may arise for the Independent System Operator and local distribution companies.

(7) The effect on peak demand for electricity.

(8) The potential for distributed energy resources to benefit the state’s distribution and transmission grid.

(b) In addition, the commission shall specifically assess the impacts of the California Solar Initiative program, specified in Section 25781 of the Public Resources Code and Section 2851, the self-generation incentive program authorized by Section 379.6, and the net energy metering program specified in Sections 2827 and 2827.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 228, Sec. 5.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

913.8.

On or before July 30, 2020, and by July 30 of every third year thereafter through 2029, the commission shall submit to the Legislature an assessment of the Multifamily Affordable Housing Solar Roofs Program (Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 2870) of Part 2). That assessment shall include the number of qualified multifamily affordable housing property sites that have a qualifying solar energy system for which an award was made pursuant to that program and, for each, the dollar value of the award and the electrical generating capacity of the qualifying renewable energy system, the bill reduction outcomes of the program for the participants, the cost of the program, the total electrical system benefits, the environmental benefits, the progress made toward reaching the goals of the program, the program’s impact on the California Alternate Rates for
 Energy (CARE) program budget, and the recommendations for improving the program to meet its goals. The report shall include an analysis of pending program commitments, reservations, obligations, and projected demands for the program to determine whether future ongoing funding allocations for the program are substantiated. The report shall also include a summary of the other programs intended to benefit disadvantaged communities, including, but not limited to, the Single-Family Affordable Solar Homes Program established by the commission in Decision 07-11-045, the Multifamily Affordable Solar Housing Program established by the commission in Decision 08-10-036, and the Green Tariff Shared Renewables Program (Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 2831) of Part 2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 214.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

913.9.

On or before December 31, 2018, and biennially thereafter, the commission shall, in its annual report prepared pursuant to Section 913, identify and report to the Legislature on electrical and gas corporation ratepayer-funded energy efficiency programs that are similar to programs administered by the Energy Commission, the State Air Resources Board, and the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority, and on those programs revised pursuant to Section 381.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 7.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

913.10.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, and the Independent System Operator, shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature a study, including findings and recommendations, identifying proposals to reduce the cost to ratepayers of expanding the state’s electrical transmission grid as necessary to achieve the state’s goals, to meet the state’s requirements, and to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases, as specified in statute, regulation, or executive order.

(b) In conducting the study, the commission shall evaluate, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) Public
 financing of transmission projects, including approaches to lower the cost of financing, and the use of nonratepayer funds to pay, a portion of the costs of transmission projects necessary to achieve relevant public policy goals. The study shall identify nonratepayer funding sources that may be suitable for this purpose.

(2) The costs and benefits of different ownership models, lease agreements, or other public-private arrangements necessary to build the transmission projects using public financing.

(3) Other proposals identified by the commission or other consulted parties that, in the judgment of the commission, could accelerate the development of, and reduce the cost to ratepayers of expanding, the state’s electrical transmission grid.

(4) Estimated cost savings of each option.

(5) Thresholds or criteria for transmission projects to be considered eligible for public financing, including, but not limited to, project size, cost, location, or achievement of statewide policy.

(6) Appropriate cost limitations and protections in exercising public financing for this purpose.

(7) Relevant local, state, and federal statute applicable to public financing of transmission infrastructure.

(c) In conducting the study, the commission shall provide opportunities for public input on which proposals to consider and on draft findings and recommendations.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 762, Sec. 5.   (AB 3264)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

913.11.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission, Energy Commission, and State Air Resources Board shall, in consultation with all California balancing authorities, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 399.12, as part of a public process, issue a joint report to the Legislature by January 1, 2021, and at least every four years thereafter.

(b) The joint report shall include all of the following:

(1) A review of the policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53, focused on technologies, forecasts, then-existing transmission, and maintaining safety, environmental and public safety protection, affordability, and system and local reliability.

(2) An evaluation identifying the potential benefits and impacts on system and local reliability associated with achieving the policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53.

(3) An evaluation identifying the nature of any anticipated financial costs and benefits to electrical, gas, and water utilities, including customer rate impacts and benefits.

(4) The barriers to, and benefits of, achieving the policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53.

(5) Alternative scenarios in which the policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53 can be achieved and the estimated costs and benefits of each scenario.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 38.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

913.12.

On or before December 1, 2024, and biennially thereafter, the commission, in consultation with California balancing authorities, as defined in Section 399.12, shall submit a report to the Legislature that
 includes all of the following:

(a) A description of the electrical transmission project applications submitted to the commission for certificates of public convenience and necessity in the preceding two-year period.

(b) The number of electrical transmission projects that were issued certificates of public convenience and necessity in the preceding two-year period.

(c) The number of electrical transmission projects that, in the preceding two-year period, went into operation,
 were approved by the Independent System Operator, and did not require the issuance of certificates of public convenience and necessity.

(d) The estimated transmission capital cost added to the rate base for each electrical transmission project that was, in the preceding two-year period, either approved by the Independent System Operator or issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   (SB 319)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

913.13.

The commission shall annually publish on its internet website and submit to the Legislature a report that includes both of the following:

(a) A report on the progress made to grow the use of distributed energy resources among residential customers in disadvantaged communities and in low-income households.

(b) An aggregated list, by census tract and ZIP Code, of all renewable electrical generation facilities, as defined in Section 2827, that began to receive service pursuant to a net energy metering contract or tariff during the preceding calendar year, including, but not limited to, median household income, home ownership,
 and racial composition, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 774, Sec. 2.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

913.14.

(a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Large electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3280.

(2) “Significant voltage-related incident” means a deviation in electrical service voltage delivered by an electrical corporation to a customer that falls outside the standard electrical service voltage range of plus or minus 5
 percent of nominal voltage and that results in damage to customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall require each large electrical corporation to commence a study to evaluate significant voltage-related incidents across its residential, commercial, and industrial customers that resulted in damage to customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more.

(2) Each study shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(A) Evaluate associated consumer protections within the service territory of the large electrical corporation.

(B) Quantify the frequency and causes of significant
 voltage-related incidents that resulted in property damage,
 including, but not limited to, the number and geographic distribution of significant voltage-related incidents reported
 from January 1, 2024, to December 31, 2026, inclusive.

(C) Identify the causes of significant voltage-related incidents, including electrical grid instability, system failures, or natural disasters such as wildfires and
 storms, reported from January 1, 2024, to December 31, 2026, inclusive.

(D) Evaluate the impacts of, and damage caused by, significant voltage-related incidents on
 the large electrical corporation’s operations and service reliability and customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property, including, but not limited to, the frequency of high- and low-voltage changes by voltage class across different customer classes, including residential, commercial, and industrial customer
 classes.

(E) Quantify the extent of reported property damage, including total monetary claims filed, approved, and denied, to different customer classes, including residential, commercial, and industrial customer classes, resulting from significant
 voltage-related incidents.

(F) Evaluate any trends in customer complaints related to significant voltage-related incidents.

(G) Examine response times and management and resolution of complaints or claims related to significant voltage-related incidents that resulted in
 damage to customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property.

(H) Describe consumer protections from significant voltage-related incidents in the large electrical corporation’s service territory.

(I) Evaluate the adequacy of the consumer protections related to reporting and public disclosure of significant voltage-related incidents that resulted in damage to customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property.

(J) Identify current outreach and support related to significant voltage-related incidents, including, but not limited to, whether current practices adequately serve low-income, rural, and limited English proficiency customers seeking reimbursement for damage to customer-owned equipment, appliances, or property.

(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the commission shall publish hyperlinks on its internet website to the studies conducted by the large electrical corporations, and report on the studies to the Legislature.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 420, Sec. 2.   (SB 593)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

913.15.

(a) Within 24 months of establishing a community renewable energy program pursuant to Section 769.3, if applicable, and annually thereafter for the duration of the program, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the facilities deployed and customers subscribed, pursuant to that program, including an analysis of low-income customer participation.

(b) (1) On or before March 31, 2024, the commission shall report to the Legislature on its actions taken pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 769.3 and its justification for terminating, modifying, or retaining each customer renewable energy subscription program pursuant to that subdivision.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2028, pursuant to
 Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 350, Sec. 3.   (AB 2316)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

913.17.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the commission, Energy Commission, and State Air Resources Board, in consultation with California balancing authorities, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 399.12, and as part of, or an interim addendum to, the quadrennial joint report required pursuant to Section 913.11, as applicable, shall issue a joint reliability progress report that reviews system and local reliability within the context of the policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 454.53, with a particular focus on summer reliability. The joint reliability progress report shall identify challenges and gaps, if any, to achieving system and local reliability and identify the amount and cause of any delays to achieving compliance with all energy and
 capacity procurement requirements set by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 39.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

913.20.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, in coordination with the Energy Commission, the Independent System Operator, and the Department of Water Resources, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature each year on the status of new resource additions and revisions to the state’s electric demand forecast, and the impact of these updates on the need for keeping the Diablo Canyon powerplant online.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 11.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

913.21.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall annually submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature on the types, amounts, and costs to ratepayers of eligible energy resources procured pursuant to Section 454.52.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 9.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

913.22.

(a) The commission may assess the extent to which electrical corporation costs associated with new loads from data centers result in cost shifts to other electrical corporation customers. This
 assessment may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) An analysis of potential electrical corporation costs associated with utility procurement to meet growing load demands from data centers’ increased energy consumption.

(2) An analysis of potential